apertium-nob.nob.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
    Copyright (C) 2009-2024, Apertium contributors (see AUTHORS file)

    This file is part of apertium-nob.

    apertium-nob is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
    it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
    the Free Software Foundation, either version 2 of the License, or
    (at your option) any later version.

    apertium-nob is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
    GNU General Public License for more details.

    You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
    along with apertium-nob.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
-->
<dictionary>
  <!--
    Generated semi-automatically from the Norsk ordbank.
    http://www.edd.uio.no/prosjekt/ordbanken/

    Grep for "todo" if you’re looking for work.

    Some of the stuff in this file that is still very much work-in-progress
    or barely begun:

    - Spelling choice pardefs, see eg. pardef n="høyr_LR_hør"

    Like a lot of the Scandinavian/Germanic Apertium dictionaries,
    this dictionary has:

    - Multiword / separable verbs (especially used from sme→nob) with <g>
      see https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Norsk#Multiword_expressions.2C_particle_verbs

    - Compounding. Most noun pardefs refer to the pardefs "cp-R" and "cp-L",

  -->
	<alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÆØÅabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzæøåcqwxzCQWXZéèêóòâôÉÊÈÓÔÒÂáàÁÀäÄöÖšŠčČðđÐýÝñÑüÜíÍıİËë-0123456789̇</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/>
		<sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/>
		<sdef n="top"   c="Toponym"/>
                <sdef n="ant"   c="Anthroponym"/>
                <sdef n="cog"   c="Cognomen"/>
                <sdef n="org"   c="Organisation"/>
                <sdef n="al"    c="Altres / misc proper nouns"/>
                <sdef n="init"  c="Initials"/>
                <sdef n="tm"    c="Trademark, type/model name"/>
		<sdef n="attr"  c="Attributive (certain proper nouns)"/>
		<sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/>
                <sdef n="pers" 	c="Personal pronoun"/>
		<sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
		<sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative pronoun (RL-only)"/>
		<sdef n="res" 	c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>
		<sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/>
		<sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/>
		<sdef n="p1" 	c="1st person"/>
		<sdef n="p2" 	c="2nd person"/>
		<sdef n="p3" 	c="3rd person"/>
		<sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/>
		<sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine, also utrum in nouns"/>
		<sdef n="GD_pers" c="Human, gender to be determined / unknown"/>
		<sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/>
		<sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/>
		<sdef n="un" 	c="No gender"/>
		<sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/>
		<sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/>
		<sdef n="du" 	c="Dual (generation only)"/>
		<sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/>
		<sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/>
		<sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/>
		<sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/>
		<sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/> <!-- the oblique case -->
		<sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/>
		<sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/>
		<sdef n="itg" 	c="Question word / interrogative"/>
		<sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/>
		<sdef n="neg" 	c="Negative"/>
		<sdef n="emph" 	c="Emphatic"/>
		<sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/>
		<sdef n="pstv" 	c="-s verb"/>
		<sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/>
		<sdef n="pres" 	c="Present"/>
		<sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/>
		<sdef n="pret" 	c="Preterite"/>
		<sdef n="pasv" 	c="Passive voice"/>
		<sdef n="pp" 	c="Perfect participle"/>
		<sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle (adjectival)"/>
		<sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/>
                <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/>
		<sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/>
		<sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/>
		<sdef n="sint" 	c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/>
		<sdef n="part" 	c="Participle (infinitive)"/>
		<sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
		<sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
		<sdef n="pst" 	c="Positive"/>
		<sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/>
		<sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="xpst"    c="Positive derivative"/>
    <sdef n="xpsts"   c="Positive derivative of synthetics"/>
    <sdef n="xpsto"   c="Positive derivative of ordinals"/>
    <sdef n="xcomp"   c="Comparative derivative"/>
    <sdef n="xsup"    c="Superlative derivative"/>
		<sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/>
		<sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/>
		<sdef n="expl" 	c="Syntactic expletive"/>
		<sdef n="unc" 	c="Uncountable"/>
		<sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence end"/>
		<sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/>
		<sdef n="clb" 	c="Possible clause boundary"/>
		<sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/>
		<sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/>
		<sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/>
		<sdef n="lquot" 	c="Left quote"/>
		<sdef n="rquot" 	c="Right quote"/>
                <sdef n="date"      c="Dates, years"/>
		<sdef n="url" 	c="URL/E-mail"/>

		<sdef n="guess" 	c="Guesser"/>
		<sdef n="cgguess" 	c="CG Guesser"/>

		<sdef n="compound-only-L" 	c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
		<sdef n="compound-R" 	c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
		<sdef n="cmp" 	c="Generation only: added by transfer to say we have a compound"/>
		<sdef n="guio" 	c="Dash, also: Generation only-mark added by transfer to say we should add a dash (e.g. for split compounds)"/>
		<sdef n="detriple" 	c="Left part of a compound where the double consonant is turned single (by composing with detriple.dix)"/>
		<sdef n="cmp-split"     c="Left part of a split compound"/>

		<sdef n="remspc" c="Tell transfer to remove preceding space"/>
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>

          <pardef n="/1" c="Adds a ¹ to the rhs.
                            Can only be combined with pardefs that don't already add a suffix
                            (so you can use it with klede__vblex_adj, but not fød/e__vblex_adj)">
            <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>¹</r></p></e>
          </pardef>
          <pardef n="/2" c="Adds a ² to the rhs.
                            Can only be combined with pardefs that don't already add a suffix
                            (so you can use it with klede__vblex_adj, but not fød/e__vblex_adj)">
            <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>²</r></p></e>
          </pardef>

          <!-- Compounding pardefs. -->
<!-- The cmp tag may be added by transfer to sg.ind forms. Even nouns
     that can’t be analysed in compounds, can be generated in
     compounds, and need to be able to make the sg.ind.cmp form.
     Ø-ep... outputs no epenthetic if used as compound-L -->
<pardef n="'s_case\Ø_no-cp">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>      <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>-</l>     <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>’s-</l>     <r><s n="gen"/><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>-</l>     <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>’s</l>    <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="'_case\Ø_no-cp">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>      <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>-</l>     <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>’-</l>     <r><s n="gen"/><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>-</l>     <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>’</l>     <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s_case\e_no-cp">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>     <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>-</l>     <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>e-</l>     <r><s n="gen"/><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>-</l>     <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="hvorav¹" c="delete in nno"><i>hvorav</i><par n="/1"/><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="også¹" c="også in nno"><i>også</i><par n="/1"/><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="måke¹" c="snø">  <i>måke</i><par n="/1"/> <par n="kommunal__n_cmp"/></e>
<e lm="gate¹" c="utgang på flyplass"><i>gate</i><par n="/1"/><par n="re_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="gang¹" c="gonge, ytterrom, passasje, tunnel"><i>gang</i><par n="/1"/><par n="ep_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="rett¹" c="rettighet"> <i>rett</i><par n="/1"/><par n="ep_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="skritt¹" c="skrev"><i>skritt</i><par n="/1"/><par n="ul__n"/></e>
<e lm="bange anelser"><p><l>bange<b/>anelser</l>       <r>bange<b/>anelser<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'_case\Ø_no-cp"/></e>
<e lm="bange anelser"><p><l>de<b/>bange<b/>anelsene</l><r>bange<b/>anelser<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="'_case\Ø_no-cp"/></e>
